Florida, session 2026, SB1690.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 65 66 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 402.306, Florida 67 Statutes, is amended to read: 68 402.306âDesignation of licensing agency; dissemination by 69 the department and local licensing agency of information on 70 child care.â 71 (3)âThe department and local licensing agencies, or the 72 designees thereof, shall be responsible for coordination and 73 dissemination of information on child care to the community and 74 shall make available through electronic means all licensing 75 standards and procedures, health and safety standards for school 76 readiness providers, monitoring and inspection reports, and the 77 names and addresses of licensed child care facilities, school 78 readiness program providers, and, where applicable pursuant to 79 s. 402.313, licensed or registered family child day care homes. 80 This information shall also include the number of deaths, 81 serious injuries, and instances of substantiated child abuse 82 that have occurred in child care settings, including those which 83 are exempt pursuant to s. 402.316(1) or (2), each year; research 84 and best practices in child development; and resources regarding 85 social-emotional development, parent and family engagement, 86 healthy eating, and physical activity. 87 Section 2.âSection 402.313, Florida Statutes, is amended to 88 read: 89 402.313âFamily child day care homes.â 90 (1)âFamily child day care homes shall be licensed under 91 this act if they are presently being licensed under an existing 92 county licensing ordinance or if the board of county 93 commissioners passes a resolution that family child day care 94 homes be licensed. 95 (a)âIf not subject to license, family child day care homes 96 shall register annually with the department, providing the 97 following information: 98 1.âThe name and address of the home. 99 2.âThe name of the operator. 100 3.âThe number of children served. 101 4.âProof of a written plan to provide at least one other 102 competent adult to be available to substitute for the operator 103 in an emergency. This plan shall include the name, address, and 104 telephone number of the designated substitute. 105 5.âProof of screening and background checks. 106 6.âProof of successful completion of the 30-hour training 107 course, as evidenced by passage of a competency examination, 108 which shall include: 109 a.âState and local rules and regulations that govern child 110 care. 111 b.âHealth, safety, and nutrition. 112 c.âIdentifying and reporting child abuse and neglect. 113 d.âChild development, including typical and atypical 114 language development; and cognitive, motor, social, and self 115 help skills development. 116 e.âObservation of developmental behaviors, including using 117 a checklist or other similar observation tools and techniques to 118 determine a childâs developmental level. 119 f.âSpecialized areas, including early literacy and language 120 development of children from birth to 5 years of age, as 121 determined by the department, for owner-operators of family 122 child day care homes. 123 7.âProof that immunization records are kept current. 124 8.âProof of completion of the required continuing education 125 units or clock hours. 126 (b)âA family child day care home may volunteer to be 127 licensed under this act. 128 (c)âThe department may provide technical assistance to 129 counties and family child day care home providers to enable 130 counties and family child day care providers to achieve 131 compliance with family child day care homes standards. 132 (2)âThis information shall be included in a directory to be 133 published annually by the department to inform the public of 134 available child care facilities. 135 (3)âChild care personnel in family child day care homes 136 shall be subject to the applicable screening provisions 137 contained in ss. 402.305(2) and 402.3055. For purposes of 138 screening in family child day care homes, the term includes any 139 member over the age of 12 years of a family child day care home 140 operatorâs family, or persons over the age of 12 years residing 141 with the operator in the family child day care home. Members of 142 the operatorâs family, or persons residing with the operator, 143 who are between the ages of 12 years and 18 years shall not be 144 required to be fingerprinted, but shall be screened for 145 delinquency records. 146 (4)âOperators of family child day care homes must 147 successfully complete an approved 30-clock-hour introductory 148 course in child care, as evidenced by passage of a competency 149 examination, before caring for children. 150 (5)âIn order to further develop their child care skills 151 and, if appropriate, their administrative skills, operators of 152 family child day care homes shall be required to complete an 153 additional 1 continuing education unit of approved training or 154 10 clock hours of equivalent training, as determined by the 155 department, annually. 156 (6)âOperators of family child day care homes shall be 157 required to complete 0.5 continuing education unit of approved 158 training in early literacy and language development of children 159 from birth to 5 years of age one time. The year that this 160 training is completed, it shall fulfill the 0.5 continuing 161 education unit or 5 clock hours of the annual training required 162 in subsection (5). 163 (7)âOperators of family child day care homes shall be 164 required annually to complete a health and safety home 165 inspection self-evaluation checklist developed by the department 166 in conjunction with the statewide resource and referral program. 167 The completed checklist shall be signed by the operator of the 168 family child day care home and provided to parents as 169 certification that basic health and safety standards are being 170 met. 171 (8)âFamily child day care home operators may avail 172 themselves of supportive services offered by the department. 173 (9)âThe department shall prepare a brochure on family child 174 day care for distribution by the department and by local 175 licensing agencies, if appropriate, to family child day care 176 homes for distribution to parents utilizing such child care, and 177 to all interested persons, including physicians and other health 178 professionals; mental health professionals; school teachers or 179 other school personnel; social workers or other professional 180 child care, foster care, residential, or institutional workers; 181 and law enforcement officers. The brochure shall, at a minimum, 182 contain the following information: 183 (a)âA brief description of the requirements for family 184 child day care registration, training, and fingerprinting and 185 screening. 186 (b)âA listing of those counties that require licensure of 187 family child day care homes. Such counties shall provide an 188 addendum to the brochure that provides a brief description of 189 the licensure requirements or may provide a brochure in lieu of 190 the one described in this subsection, provided it contains all 191 the required information on licensure and the required 192 information in the subsequent paragraphs. 193 (c)âA statement indicating that information about the 194 family child day care homeâs compliance with applicable state or 195 local requirements can be obtained by telephoning the department 196 office or the office of the local licensing agency, if 197 appropriate, at a telephone number or numbers which shall be 198 affixed to the brochure. 199 (d)âThe statewide toll-free telephone number of the central 200 abuse hotline, together with a notice that reports of suspected 201 and actual child physical abuse, sexual abuse, and neglect are 202 received and referred for investigation by the hotline. 203 (e)âAny other information relating to competent child care 204 that the department or local licensing agency, if preparing a 205 separate brochure, deems would be helpful to parents and other 206 caretakers in their selection of a family child day care home. 207 (10)âOn an annual basis, the department shall evaluate the 208 registration and licensure system for family child day care 209 homes. Such evaluation shall, at a minimum, address the 210 following: 211 (a)âThe number of family child day care homes registered 212 and licensed and the dates of such registration and licensure. 213 (b)âThe number of children being served in both registered 214 and licensed family child day care homes and any available slots 215 in such homes. 216 (c)âThe number of complaints received concerning family 217 child day care, the nature of the complaints, and the resolution 218 of such complaints. 219 (d)âThe training activities utilized by child care 220 personnel in family child day care homes for meeting the state 221 or local training requirements. 222 223 The evaluation shall be utilized by the department in any 224 administrative modifications or adjustments to be made in the 225 registration of family child day care homes or in any 226 legislative requests for modifications to the system of 227 registration or to other requirements for family child day care 228 homes. 229 (11)âIn order to inform the public of the state requirement 230 for registration of family child day care homes as well as the 231 other requirements for such homes to legally operate in the 232 state, the department shall institute a media campaign to 233 accomplish this end. Such a campaign shall include, at a 234 minimum, flyers, newspaper advertisements, radio advertisements, 235 and television advertisements. 236 (12)âNotwithstanding any other state or local law or 237 ordinance, any family child day care home licensed pursuant to 238 this chapter or pursuant to a county ordinance shall be charged 239 the utility rates accorded to a residential home. A licensed 240 family child day care home may not be charged commercial utility 241 rates. 242 (13)âThe department shall, by rule, establish minimum 243 standards for family child day care homes that are required to 244 be licensed by county licensing ordinance or county licensing 245 resolution or that voluntarily choose to be licensed. The 246 standards should include requirements for staffing, training, 247 maintenance of immunization records, minimum health and safety 248 standards, reduced standards for the regulation of child care 249 during evening hours by municipalities and counties, and 250 enforcement of standards. 251 (14)âDuring the months of August and September of each 252 year, each family day care home shall provide parents of 253 children enrolled in the home detailed information regarding the 254 causes, symptoms, and transmission of the influenza virus in an 255 effort to educate those parents regarding the importance of 256 immunizing their children against influenza as recommended by 257 the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers 258 for Disease Control and Prevention. 259 (15)âDuring the months of April and September of each year, 260 at a minimum, each family day care home shall provide parents of 261 children attending the family day care home information 262 regarding the potential for a distracted adult to fail to drop 263 off a child at the family day care home and instead leave the 264 child in the adultâs vehicle upon arrival at the adultâs 265 destination. The family day care home shall also give parents 266 information about resources with suggestions to avoid this 267 occurrence. The department shall develop a flyer or brochure 268 with this information that shall be posted to the departmentâs 269 website, which family day care homes may choose to reproduce and 270 provide to parents to satisfy the requirements of this 271 subsection. 272 Section 3.âSubsections (9) and (10) of section 402.3131, 273 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 274 402.3131âLarge family child care homes.â 275 (9)âDuring the months of August and September of each year, 276 each large family child care home shall provide parents of 277 children enrolled in the home detailed information regarding the 278 causes, symptoms, and transmission of the influenza virus in an 279 effort to educate those parents regarding the importance of 280 immunizing their children against influenza as recommended by 281 the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers 282 for Disease Control and Prevention. 283 (10)âDuring the months of April and September of each year, 284 at a minimum, each large family child care home shall provide 285 parents of children attending the large family child care home 286 information regarding the potential for a distracted adult to 287 fail to drop off a child at the large family child care home and 288 instead leave the child in the adultâs vehicle upon arrival at 289 the adultâs destination. The large family child care home shall 290 also give parents information about resources with suggestions 291 to avoid this occurrence. The department shall develop a flyer 292 or brochure with this information that shall be posted to the 293 departmentâs website, which large family child care homes may 294 choose to reproduce and provide to parents to satisfy the 295 requirements of this subsection. 296 Section 4.âSection 402.316, Florida Statutes, is amended to 297 read: 298 402.316âExemptions.â 299 (1)âThe provisions of ss. 402.301-402.319, except for the 300 requirements regarding screening of child care personnel 301 pursuant to ss. 402.305 and 402.3055, do not apply to a child 302 care facility which is an integral part of church or parochial 303 schools, or a child care facility that solely provides child 304 care to eligible children as defined in s. 402.261(1)(c), 305 conducting regularly scheduled classes, courses of study, or 306 educational programs accredited by, or by a member of, an 307 organization that which publishes and requires compliance with 308 its standards for health, safety, and sanitation. However, Such 309 facilities must shall meet minimum requirements of the 310 applicable local governing body as to health, sanitation, and 311 safety and shall meet the screening requirements pursuant to ss. 312 402.305 and 402.3055. Failure by a facility to comply with such 313 screening requirements pursuant to ss. 402.305 and 402.3055 314 shall result in the loss of the facilityâs exemption from 315 licensure. 316 (2)âThe provisions of ss. 402.301-402.319, except for the 317 requirements regarding screening of child care personnel 318 pursuant to ss. 402.305 and 402.3055, do not apply to a child 319 care facility that solely provides child care to eligible 320 children as defined in s. 402.261(1)(c). Such facilities must 321 meet minimum requirements of the applicable local governing body 322 as to health, sanitation, and safety. Failure by a facility to 323 comply with screening requirements pursuant to ss. 402.305 and 324 402.3055 shall result in the loss of the facilityâs exemption 325 from licensure. 326 (3)(2)âThe provisions of ss. 402.301-402.319 do not apply 327 to a child care facility or family child day care home if the 328 child care facility or family child day care home has a 329 certificate issued by the United States Department of Defense or 330 by the United States Coast Guard to provide child care and has 331 completed background screening by the United States Department 332 of Defense pursuant to 34 U.S.C. s. 20351 and 32 C.F.R. part 86 333 and received a favorable suitability and fitness determination. 334 If the child care facility or family child day care home elects 335 to serve children ineligible for care under the United States 336 Department of Defense Instruction 6060.02, the child care 337 facility or family child day care home must be licensed under 338 this chapter. 339 (4)(3)âAny child care facility covered by the exemption 340 under subsection (1) or subsection (2) which desires to be 341 licensed may submit an application to the department or local 342 licensing agency pursuant to s. 402.308(4). 343 (5)(4)âThe department and the local licensing agency 344 pursuant to s. 402.308(4) shall adopt rules to administer and 345 implement this section, including, but not limited to, any 346 assessments of previous licensure history. 347 (6)âA child care facility exempt under subsection (1) or 348 subsection (2) must include, at a minimum, the following 349 statement on its website, in its promotional materials, and on 350 its facility-created documents and forms provided to families 351 served by the child care facility: â(Child care facility name) 352 is a child care facility operating under an exemption pursuant 353 to the laws of the State of Florida and is not subject to 354 licensure or regulation by the Department of Children and 355 Families.â 356 Section 5.âSection 627.70161, Florida Statutes, is amended 357 to read: 358 627.70161âFamily child day care and large family child care 359 insurance.â 360 (1)âPURPOSE AND INTENT.âThe Legislature recognizes that 361 family child day care and large family child care homes fulfill 362 a vital role in providing child care in Florida. It is the 363 intent of the Legislature that residential property insurance 364 coverage should not be canceled, denied, or nonrenewed solely on 365 the basis of the child family day care services at the 366 residence. The Legislature also recognizes that the potential 367 liability of residential property insurers is substantially 368 increased by the rendition of child care services on the 369 premises. The Legislature therefore finds that there is a public 370 need to specify that contractual liabilities that arise in 371 connection with the operation of the family child day care home 372 or the large family child care home are excluded from 373 residential property insurance policies unless they are 374 specifically included in such coverage. 375 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 376 (a)ââChild careâ means the care, protection, and 377 supervision of a child, for a period of less than 24 hours a day 378 on a regular basis, which supplements parental care, enrichment, 379 and health supervision for the child, in accordance with his or 380 her individual needs, and for which a payment, fee, or grant is 381 made for care. 382 (b)ââFamily child day care homeâ means an occupied 383 residence in which child care is regularly provided for children 384 from at least two unrelated families and which receives a 385 payment, fee, or grant for any of the children receiving care, 386 whether or not operated for a profit. 387 (c)ââLarge family child care homeâ means an occupied 388 residence in which child care is regularly provided for children 389 from at least two unrelated families; which receives a payment, 390 fee, or grant for any of the children receiving care, whether or 391 not operated for profit; and which has at least two full-time 392 child care personnel on the premises during the hours of 393 operation. One of the two full-time child care personnel must be 394 the owner or occupant of the residence. A large family child 395 care home must first have operated as a licensed family child 396 care home for at least 2 years, with an operator who has held a 397 child development associate credential or its equivalent for at 398 least 1 year, before seeking licensure as a large family child 399 care home. Household children under 13 years of age, when on the 400 premises of the large family child care home or on a field trip 401 with children enrolled in child care, must be included in the 402 overall capacity of the licensed home. A large family child care 403 home may provide care for one of the following groups of 404 children, which must include household children under 13 years 405 of age: 406 1.âA maximum of 8 children from birth to 24 months of age. 407 2.âA maximum of 12 children, with no more than 4 children 408 under 24 months of age. 409 (3)âFAMILY CHILD DAY CARE AND LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE 410 HOMES; COVERAGE.âA residential property insurance policy may 411 shall not provide coverage for liability for claims arising out 412 of, or in connection with, the operation of a family child day 413 care home or a large family child care home, and the insurer 414 shall be under no obligation to defend against lawsuits covering 415 such claims, unless: 416 (a)âSpecifically covered in a policy; or 417 (b)âCovered by a rider or endorsement for business coverage 418 attached to a policy. 419 (4)âDENIAL, CANCELLATION, REFUSAL TO RENEW PROHIBITED.âAn 420 insurer may not deny, cancel, or refuse to renew a policy for 421 residential property insurance solely on the basis that the 422 policyholder or applicant operates a family child day care home 423 or a large family child care home. In addition to other lawful 424 reasons for refusing to insure, an insurer may deny, cancel, or 425 refuse to renew a policy of a family child day care home or 426 large family child care home provider if one or more of the 427 following conditions occur: 428 (a)âThe policyholder or applicant provides care for more 429 children than authorized for family day care homes by s. 430 402.302; 431 (b)âThe policyholder or applicant fails to maintain a 432 separate commercial liability policy or an endorsement providing 433 liability coverage for the family child day care home or large 434 family child care home operations; 435 (c)âThe policyholder or applicant fails to comply with the 436 applicable family day care home licensure and registration 437 requirements specified in chapter 402 s. 402.313; or 438 (d)âDiscovery of willful or grossly negligent acts or 439 omissions or any violations of state laws or regulations 440 establishing safety standards for family child day care homes or 441 large family child care homes by the named insured or his or her 442 representative which materially increase any of the risks 443 insured. 444 Section 6.âSection 1001.24, Florida Statutes, is amended to 445 read: 446 1001.24âDirect-support organization; use of property; board 447 of directors; audit.â 448 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âFor the purposes of this section, the 449 term: 450 (a)ââDepartment of Education direct-support organizationâ 451 means an organization: 452 1.âThat is a corporation not for profit that is 453 incorporated under the provisions of chapter 617 and approved by 454 the Department of State. 455 2.âThat is organized and operated exclusively to receive, 456 hold, invest, and administer property and to make expenditures 457 to or for the benefit of early learning programs for children 458 from birth to 5 years of age and public prekindergarten through 459 12th grade education in this state. 460 3.âThat the State Board of Education, after review, has 461 certified to be operating in a manner consistent with the goals 462 and best interest of the Department of Education. 463 (b)ââPersonal servicesâ includes full-time or part-time 464 personnel, as well as payroll processing. 465 (2)âUSE OF PROPERTY.âThe State Board of Education: 466 (a)âMay permit the use of property, facilities, and 467 personal services of the department by the direct-support 468 organization, subject to the provisions of this section. 469 (b)âShall prescribe by rule conditions with which the 470 direct-support organization must comply in order to use 471 property, facilities, or personal services of the department. 472 Such rules shall provide for budget and audit review and for 473 oversight by the department. 474 (c)âShall not permit the use of property, facilities, or 475 personal services of the direct-support organization if such 476 organization does not provide equal employment opportunities to 477 all persons, regardless of race, color, national origin, gender, 478 age, or religion. 479 (3)âBOARD OF DIRECTORS.âThe board of directors of the 480 department direct-support organization shall be appointed by the 481 commissioner and shall include representation from business, 482 industry, and other components of Floridaâs economy. 483 (4)âANNUAL AUDIT.âEach direct-support organization shall 484 provide for an annual financial audit in accordance with s. 485 215.981. The identity of donors who desire to remain anonymous 486 shall be protected, and that anonymity shall be maintained in 487 the auditorâs report. All records of the organization other than 488 the auditorâs report, management letter, and any supplemental 489 data requested by the Auditor General and the Office of Program 490 Policy Analysis and Government Accountability shall be 491 confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1). 492 Section 7.âSection 1002.821, Florida Statutes, is created 493 to read: 494 1002.821âFlorida Child Care Fund.âThe Florida Child Care 495 Fund is established to support early learning and child care 496 needs of Florida families. 497 (1)âA Department of Education direct-support organization 498 established pursuant to s. 1001.24 shall administer the fund. 499 (2)(a)âAny bequests, gifts, grants, and donations made to 500 the fund as may be solicited for such purpose from public or 501 private sources shall be deposited into the Early Learning Fund. 502 (b)âAny legislative appropriation from the Child Care and 503 Development Block Grant Trust Fund which may be provided to the 504 Florida Child Care Fund shall be deposited into the Early 505 Learning Fund and shall be used to fund children from the 506 waiting list under subparagraph (3)(a)1. 507 (c)âAny funds received from state sources and interest 508 earnings shall be accounted for separately. 509 (3)âFunds shall be used for the following purposes: 510 (a)âTo provide care for children from birth until the child 511 is eligible to enroll in kindergarten in accordance with: 512 1.âAn allocation methodology to fund the waiting list of 513 early learning coalitions; or 514 2.âThe intentions of a donor. 515 (b)âThe early learning coalition shall fund school 516 readiness program providers and providers selected by the 517 donorâs recipient at the reimbursement rate calculated pursuant 518 to s. 1002.84(17). If the provider selected by the donorâs 519 recipient is not a school readiness program provider, the 520 department shall adopt a contract for use by an early learning 521 coalition with the provider to provide such funds. 522 (c)âAny family served under subparagraph (a)1. shall have 523 an early learning coalition apply a parent copayment based on 524 family income pursuant to s. 1002.84(9) or s. 1002.935(2)(b). 525 (4)âBeginning January 1, 2027, and each January 1 526 thereafter, the Division of Early Learning shall prepare, and 527 the department shall publish on its website, a report that 528 summarizes the performance of the Florida Child Care Fund and 529 the fundâs fundraising activities for the previous fiscal year, 530 and identifies the child care needs supported by the fund 531 principal or earnings and those supported by private sources, 532 bequests, gifts, grants, and donations. The report must also 533 include: 534 (a)âOutcome data, including the number of children served 535 and any child outcomes, by each early learning coalition. 536 (b)âThe amount of funds spent on administrative expenses 537 and fundraising and the amount of funds raised from private 538 sources. 539 Section 8.âPresent subsection (2) of section 1002.95, 540 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (3), and a new 541 subsection (2) is added to that section, to read: 542 1002.95âTeacher Education and Compensation Helps (TEACH) 543 Scholarship Program.â 544 (2)âSubject to an appropriation, the TEACH Scholarship 545 Program administrator shall also establish and administer the 546 Center for Early Childhood Professional Recognition to ensure 547 alignment of training statewide, including, but not limited to, 548 a system of training approval, a system of trainer approval, and 549 implementation of competency-based assessments aligned to the 550 early learning professional development standards and career 551 pathways under s. 1002.995. 552 Section 9.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 553 39.202, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 554 39.202âConfidentiality of reports and records in cases of 555 child abuse or neglect; exception.â 556 (2)âExcept as provided in subsection (4), access to such 557 records, excluding the name of, or other identifying information 558 with respect to, the reporter which may only be released as 559 provided in subsection (5), may only be granted to the following 560 persons, officials, and agencies: 561 (a)âEmployees, authorized agents, or contract providers of 562 the department, the Department of Health, the Agency for Persons 563 with Disabilities, the Agency for Health Care Administration, 564 the Department of Education, or county agencies responsible for 565 carrying out: 566 1.âChild or adult protective investigations; 567 2.âOngoing child or adult protective services; 568 3.âEarly intervention and prevention services; 569 4.âHealthy Start services; 570 5.âLicensure or approval of adoptive homes, foster homes, 571 child care facilities, facilities licensed under chapters 393 572 and 394, family child day care homes, providers who receive 573 school readiness funding under part VI of chapter 1002, or other 574 homes used to provide for the care and welfare of children; 575 6.âEmployment screening for caregivers in residential group 576 homes and facilities licensed under chapters 393, 394, and 409; 577 or 578 7.âServices for victims of domestic violence when provided 579 by certified domestic violence centers working at the 580 departmentâs request as case consultants or with shared clients. 581 582 Also, employees or agents of the Department of Juvenile Justice 583 responsible for the provision of services to children, pursuant 584 to chapters 984 and 985. 585 Section 10.âSection 125.0109, Florida Statutes, is amended 586 to read: 587 125.0109âFamily child day care homes; local zoning 588 regulation.âThe operation of a residence as a family child day 589 care home, as defined by law, registered or licensed with the 590 Department of Children and Families shall constitute a valid 591 residential use for purposes of any local zoning regulations, 592 and no such regulation shall require the owner or operator of 593 such family child day care home to obtain any special exemption 594 or use permit or waiver, or to pay any special fee in excess of 595 $50, to operate in an area zoned for residential use. 596 Section 11.âSection 166.0445, Florida Statutes, is amended 597 to read: 598 166.0445âFamily child day care homes; local zoning 599 regulation.âThe operation of a residence as a family child day 600 care home, as defined by law, registered or licensed with the 601 Department of Children and Families shall constitute a valid 602 residential use for purposes of any local zoning regulations, 603 and no such regulation shall require the owner or operator of 604 such family child day care home to obtain any special exemption 605 or use permit or waiver, or to pay any special fee in excess of 606 $50, to operate in an area zoned for residential use. 607 Section 12.âParagraph (j) of subsection (7) of section 608 212.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 609 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 610 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 611 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 612 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 613 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 614 chapter. 615 (7)âMISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.âExemptions provided to any 616 entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is 617 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a 618 representative or employee of the entity by any means, 619 including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even 620 when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed 621 by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by 622 this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is 623 otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has 624 obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department 625 or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as 626 required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made 627 with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this 628 subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an 629 exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict 630 compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and 631 shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer 632 this subsection. 633 (j)âHousehold fuels.âAlso exempt from payment of the tax 634 imposed by this chapter are sales of utilities to residential 635 households or owners of residential models in this state by 636 utility companies who pay the gross receipts tax imposed under 637 s. 203.01, and sales of fuel to residential households or owners 638 of residential models, including oil, kerosene, liquefied 639 petroleum gas, coal, wood, and other fuel products used in the 640 household or residential model for the purposes of heating, 641 cooking, lighting, and refrigeration, regardless of whether such 642 sales of utilities and fuels are separately metered and billed 643 direct to the residents or are metered and billed to the 644 landlord. If any part of the utility or fuel is used for a 645 nonexempt purpose, the entire sale is taxable. The landlord 646 shall provide a separate meter for nonexempt utility or fuel 647 consumption. For the purposes of this paragraph, licensed family 648 child day care homes shall also be exempt. 649 Section 13.âSubsections (3), (8), (9), and (11) of section 650 402.302, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 651 402.302âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 652 (3)ââChild care personnelâ means all owners, operators, 653 employees, and volunteers working in a child care facility. The 654 term does not include persons who work in a child care facility 655 after hours when children are not present or parents of children 656 in a child care facility. For purposes of screening, the term 657 includes any member, over the age of 12 years, of a child care 658 facility operatorâs family, or person, over the age of 12 years, 659 residing with a child care facility operator if the child care 660 facility is located in or adjacent to the home of the operator 661 or if the family member of, or person residing with, the child 662 care facility operator has any direct contact with the children 663 in the facility during its hours of operation. Members of the 664 operatorâs family or persons residing with the operator who are 665 between the ages of 12 years and 18 years are not required to be 666 fingerprinted but must be screened for delinquency records. For 667 purposes of screening, the term also includes persons who work 668 in child care programs that provide care for children 15 hours 669 or more each week in public or nonpublic schools, family child 670 day care homes, membership organizations under s. 402.301, or 671 programs otherwise exempted under s. 402.316. The term does not 672 include public or nonpublic school personnel who are providing 673 care during regular school hours, or after hours for activities 674 related to a schoolâs program for grades kindergarten through 675 12. A volunteer who assists on an intermittent basis for less 676 than 10 hours per month is not included in the term âpersonnelâ 677 for the purposes of screening and training if a person who meets 678 the screening requirement of s. 402.305(2) is always present and 679 has the volunteer in his or her line of sight. Students who 680 observe and participate in a child care facility as a part of 681 their required coursework are not considered child care 682 personnel, provided such observation and participation are on an 683 intermittent basis and a person who meets the screening 684 requirement of s. 402.305(2) is always present and has the 685 student in his or her line of sight. 686 (8)ââFamily child day care homeâ means an occupied 687 residence in which child care is regularly provided for children 688 from at least two unrelated families and which receives a 689 payment, fee, or grant for any of the children receiving care, 690 whether or not operated for profit. Household children under 13 691 years of age, when on the premises of the family child day care 692 home or on a field trip with children enrolled in child care, 693 shall be included in the overall capacity of the licensed home. 694 A family child day care home shall be allowed to provide care 695 for one of the following groups of children, which shall include 696 household children under 13 years of age: 697 (a)âA maximum of four children from birth to 12 months of 698 age. 699 (b)âA maximum of three children from birth to 12 months of 700 age, and other children, for a maximum total of six children. 701 (c)âA maximum of six preschool children if all are older 702 than 12 months of age. 703 (d)âA maximum of 10 children if no more than 5 are 704 preschool age and, of those 5, no more than 2 are under 12 705 months of age. 706 (9)ââHousehold childrenâ means children who are related by 707 blood, marriage, or legal adoption to, or who are the legal 708 wards of, the family child day care home operator, the large 709 family child care home operator, or an adult household member 710 who permanently or temporarily resides in the home. Supervision 711 of the operatorâs household children shall be left to the 712 discretion of the operator unless those children receive 713 subsidized child care through the school readiness program 714 pursuant to s. 1002.92 to be in the home. 715 (11)ââLarge family child care homeâ means an occupied 716 residence in which child care is regularly provided for children 717 from at least two unrelated families, which receives a payment, 718 fee, or grant for any of the children receiving care, whether or 719 not operated for profit, and which has at least two full-time 720 child care personnel on the premises during the hours of 721 operation. One of the two full-time child care personnel must be 722 the owner or occupant of the residence. A large family child 723 care home must first have operated as a licensed family child 724 day care home for 2 years, with an operator who has had a child 725 development associate credential or its equivalent for 1 year, 726 before seeking licensure as a large family child care home. 727 Household children under 13 years of age, when on the premises 728 of the large family child care home or on a field trip with 729 children enrolled in child care, shall be included in the 730 overall capacity of the licensed home. A large family child care 731 home shall be allowed to provide care for one of the following 732 groups of children, which shall include household children under 733 13 years of age: 734 (a)âA maximum of 8 children from birth to 24 months of age. 735 (b)âA maximum of 12 children, with no more than 4 children 736 under 24 months of age. 737 Section 14.âParagraph (a) of subsection (17) of section 738 402.305, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 739 402.305âLicensing standards; child care facilities.â 740 (17)âTRANSFER OF OWNERSHIP.â 741 (a)âOne week prior to the transfer of ownership of a child 742 care facility or family child day care home, the transferor 743 shall notify the parent or caretaker of each child of the 744 impending transfer. 745 Section 15.âSubsections (1), (2), and (3) of section 746 402.309, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 747 402.309âProvisional license or registration.â 748 (1)âThe local licensing agency or the department, whichever 749 is authorized to license child care facilities in a county, may 750 issue a provisional license for child care facilities, family 751 child day care homes, or large family child care homes, or a 752 provisional registration for family child day care homes to 753 applicants for an initial license or registration or to 754 licensees or registrants seeking a renewal who are unable to 755 meet all the standards provided for in ss. 402.301-402.319. 756 (2)âA provisional license or registration may not be issued 757 unless the operator or owner makes adequate provisions for the 758 health and safety of the child. A provisional license may be 759 issued for a child care facility if all of the screening 760 materials have been timely submitted. A provisional license or 761 registration may not be issued unless the child care facility, 762 family child day care home, or large family child care home is 763 in compliance with the requirements for screening of child care 764 personnel in ss. 402.305, 402.3055, 402.313, and 402.3131, 765 respectively. 766 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), a local licensing 767 agency or the department, whichever is authorized to license 768 child care facilities in a county, must issue a provisional 769 license or registration if the operator or owner: 770 (a)âIs applying for an initial license or registration for 771 a child care facility, a family child day care home, or a large 772 family child care home; 773 (b)âHas made adequate provisions for the health and safety 774 of the child; and 775 (c)âProvides evidence that he or she has completed, within 776 the previous 6 months, training pursuant to United States 777 Department of Defense Instruction 6060.02 and background 778 screening by the United States Department of Defense pursuant to 779 34 U.S.C. s. 20351 and 32 C.F.R. part 86 and received a 780 favorable suitability and fitness determination. 781 Section 16.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) and subsection 782 (4) of section 402.310, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 783 402.310âDisciplinary actions; hearings upon denial, 784 suspension, or revocation of license or registration; 785 administrative fines.â 786 (1) 787 (d)âThe disciplinary sanctions set forth in this section 788 apply to licensed child care facilities, licensed large family 789 child care homes, and licensed or registered family child day 790 care homes. 791 (4)âAn applicant, registrant, or licensee shall have the 792 right to appeal a decision of the local licensing agency to a 793 representative of the department. Any required hearing shall be 794 held in the county in which the child care facility, family 795 child day care home, or large family child care home is being 796 operated or is to be established. The hearing shall be conducted 797 in accordance with the provisions of chapter 120. 798 Section 17.âSubsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection 799 (2) of section 402.3115, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 800 402.3115âElimination of duplicative and unnecessary 801 inspections; abbreviated inspections.â 802 (1)âThe Department of Children and Families and local 803 governmental agencies that license child care facilities shall 804 develop and implement a plan to eliminate duplicative and 805 unnecessary inspections of child care facilities, family child 806 day care homes, and large family child care homes. 807 (2)(a)âThe department and the local governmental agencies 808 shall develop and implement an abbreviated inspection plan for 809 child care facilities, family child day care homes, and large 810 family child care homes that meet all of the following 811 conditions: 812 1.âHave been licensed for at least 2 consecutive years. 813 2.âHave not had a Class 1 deficiency, as defined by rule, 814 for at least 2 consecutive years. 815 3.âHave not had more than three of the same Class 2 816 deficiencies, as defined by rule, for at least 2 consecutive 817 years. 818 4.âHave received at least two full onsite renewal 819 inspections in the most recent 2 years. 820 5.âDo not have any current uncorrected violations. 821 6.âDo not have any open regulatory complaints or active 822 child protective services investigations. 823 Section 18.âSection 402.312, Florida Statutes, is amended 824 to read: 825 402.312âLicense required; injunctive relief.â 826 (1)âThe operation of a child care facility without a 827 license, a family child day care home without a license or 828 registration, or a large family child care home without a 829 license is prohibited. If the department or the local licensing 830 agency discovers that a child care facility is being operated 831 without a license, a family child day care home is being 832 operated without a license or registration, or a large family 833 child care home is being operated without a license, the 834 department or local licensing agency is authorized to seek an 835 injunction in the circuit court where the facility is located to 836 enjoin continued operation of such facility, family child day 837 care home, or large family child care home. When the court is 838 closed for the transaction of judicial business, the department 839 or local licensing agency is authorized to seek an emergency 840 injunction to enjoin continued operation of such unlicensed 841 facility, unregistered or unlicensed family child day care home, 842 or unlicensed large family child care home, which injunction 843 shall be continued, modified, or revoked on the next day of 844 judicial business. 845 (2)âOther grounds for seeking an injunction to close a 846 child care facility, family child day care home, or a large 847 family child care home are that: 848 (a)âThere is any violation of the standards applied under 849 ss. 402.301-402.319 which threatens harm to any child in the 850 child care facility, a family child day care home, or large 851 family child care home. 852 (b)âA licensee or registrant has repeatedly violated the 853 standards provided for under ss. 402.301-402.319. 854 (c)âA child care facility, family child day care home, or 855 large family child care home continues to have children in 856 attendance after the closing date established by the department 857 or the local licensing agency. 858 (3)âThe department or local licensing agency may impose an 859 administrative fine on any child care facility, family child day 860 care home, or large family child care home operating without a 861 license or registration, consistent with the provisions of s. 862 402.310. 863 Section 19.âSubsection (3) of section 402.315, Florida 864 Statutes, is amended to read: 865 402.315âFunding; license fees.â 866 (3)âThe department shall collect a fee for any license it 867 issues for a child care facility, family child day care home, or 868 large family child care home pursuant to ss. 402.305, 402.313, 869 and 402.3131. 870 (a)âFor a child care facility licensed pursuant to s. 871 402.305, such fee shall be $1 per child, based on the licensed 872 capacity of the facility, except that the minimum fee shall be 873 $25 per facility and the maximum fee shall be $100 per facility. 874 (b)âFor a family child day care home registered pursuant to 875 s. 402.313, such fee shall be $25. 876 (c)âFor a family child day care home licensed pursuant to 877 s. 402.313, such fee shall be $50. 878 (d)âFor a large family child care home licensed pursuant to 879 s. 402.3131, such fee shall be $60. 880 Section 20.âSection 402.318, Florida Statutes, is amended 881 to read: 882 402.318âAdvertisement.âA person, as defined in s. 1.01(3), 883 may not advertise a child care facility, family child day care 884 home, or large family child care home without including within 885 such advertisement the state or local agency license number or 886 registration number of such facility or home. Violation of this 887 section is a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 888 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 889 Section 21.âSection 402.319, Florida Statutes, is amended 890 to read: 891 402.319âPenalties.â 892 (1)âIt is a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 893 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, for any person knowingly 894 to: 895 (a)âFail, by false statement, misrepresentation, 896 impersonation, or other fraudulent means, to disclose in any 897 application for voluntary or paid employment or licensure 898 regulated under ss. 402.301-402.318 all information required 899 under those sections or a material fact used in making a 900 determination as to such personâs qualifications to be child 901 care personnel, as defined in s. 402.302, in a child care 902 facility, family child day care home, or other child care 903 program. 904 (b)âOperate or attempt to operate a child care facility 905 without having procured a license as required by this act. 906 (c)âOperate or attempt to operate a family child day care 907 home without a license or without registering with the 908 department, whichever is applicable. 909 (d)âOperate or attempt to operate a child care facility or 910 family child day care home under a license that is suspended, 911 revoked, or terminated. 912 (e)âMisrepresent, by act or omission, a child care facility 913 or family child day care home to be duly licensed pursuant to 914 this act without being so licensed. 915 (f)âMake any other misrepresentation, by act or omission, 916 regarding the licensure or operation of a child care facility or 917 family child day care home to a parent or guardian who has a 918 child placed in the facility or is inquiring as to placing a 919 child in the facility, or to a representative of the licensing 920 authority, or to a representative of a law enforcement agency, 921 including, but not limited to, any misrepresentation as to: 922 1.âThe number of children at the child care facility or the 923 family child day care home; 924 2.âThe part of the child care facility or family child day 925 care home designated for child care; 926 3.âThe qualifications or credentials of child care 927 personnel; 928 4.âWhether a family child day care home or child care 929 facility complies with the screening requirements of s. 402.305; 930 or 931 5.âWhether child care personnel have the training as 932 required by s. 402.305. 933 (2)âIf any child care personnel makes any misrepresentation 934 in violation of this section to a parent or guardian who has 935 placed a child in the child care facility or family child day 936 care home, and the parent or guardian relied upon the 937 misrepresentation, and the child suffers great bodily harm, 938 permanent disfigurement, permanent disability, or death as a 939 result of an intentional act or negligence by the child care 940 personnel, then the child care personnel commits a felony of the 941 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 942 or s. 775.084. 943 (3)âEach child care facility, family child day care home, 944 and large family child care home shall annually submit an 945 affidavit of compliance with s. 39.201. 946 Section 22.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 947 409.988, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 948 409.988âCommunity-based care lead agency duties; general 949 provisions.â 950 (2)âLICENSURE.â 951 (c)âSubstitute care providers who are licensed under s. 952 409.175 and who have contracted with a lead agency are also 953 authorized to provide registered or licensed family child day 954 care under s. 402.313 if such care is consistent with federal 955 law and if the home has met the requirements of s. 402.313. 956 Section 23.âParagraph (b) of subsection (8) of section 957 411.203, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 958 411.203âContinuum of comprehensive services.âThe Department 959 of Education and the Department of Health shall utilize the 960 continuum of prevention and early assistance services for high 961 risk pregnant women and for high-risk and handicapped children 962 and their families, as outlined in this section, as a basis for 963 the intraagency and interagency program coordination, 964 monitoring, and analysis required in this chapter. The continuum 965 shall be the guide for the comprehensive statewide approach for 966 services for high-risk pregnant women and for high-risk and 967 handicapped children and their families, and may be expanded or 968 reduced as necessary for the enhancement of those services. 969 Expansion or reduction of the continuum shall be determined by 970 intraagency or interagency findings and agreement, whichever is 971 applicable. Implementation of the continuum shall be based upon 972 applicable eligibility criteria, availability of resources, and 973 interagency prioritization when programs impact both agencies, 974 or upon single agency prioritization when programs impact only 975 one agency. The continuum shall include, but not be limited to: 976 (8)âSUPPORT SERVICES FOR ALL EXPECTANT PARENTS AND PARENTS 977 OF HIGH-RISK CHILDREN.â 978 (b)âChild care and early childhood programs, including, but 979 not limited to, licensed child care facilities, family child day 980 care homes, therapeutic child care, Head Start, and preschool 981 programs in public and private schools. 982 Section 24.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 983 1002.55, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 984 1002.55âSchool-year prekindergarten program delivered by 985 private prekindergarten providers.â 986 (3)âTo be eligible to deliver the prekindergarten program, 987 a private prekindergarten provider must meet each of the 988 following requirements: 989 (a)âThe private prekindergarten provider must be a child 990 care facility licensed under s. 402.305, family child day care 991 home licensed under s. 402.313, large family child care home 992 licensed under s. 402.3131, nonpublic school exempt from 993 licensure under s. 402.3025(2), faith-based child care provider 994 exempt from licensure under s. 402.316, child development 995 program that is accredited by a national accrediting body and 996 operates on a military installation that is certified by the 997 United States Department of Defense, or private prekindergarten 998 provider that has been issued a provisional license under s. 999 402.309. A private prekindergarten provider may not deliver the 1000 program while holding a probation-status license under s. 1001 402.310. 1002 Section 25.âParagraph (u) of subsection (2) of section 1003 1002.82, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1004 1002.82âDepartment of Education; powers and duties.â 1005 (2)âThe department shall: 1006 (u)âAdminister a statewide toll-free Warm-Line to provide 1007 assistance and consultation to child care facilities and family 1008 child day care homes regarding health, developmental, 1009 disability, and special needs issues of the children they are 1010 serving, particularly children with disabilities and other 1011 special needs. The department shall: 1012 1.âAnnually inform child care facilities and family child 1013 day care homes of the availability of this service through the 1014 child care resource and referral network under s. 1002.92. 1015 2.âExpand or contract for the expansion of the Warm-Line to 1016 maintain at least one Warm-Line in each early learning coalition 1017 service area. 1018 Section 26.âParagraph (j) of subsection (4) of section 1019 1002.83, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1020 1002.83âEarly learning coalitions.â 1021 (4)âEach early learning coalition must include the 1022 following member positions; however, in a multicounty coalition, 1023 each ex officio member position may be filled by multiple 1024 nonvoting members but no more than one voting member shall be 1025 seated per member position. If an early learning coalition has 1026 more than one member representing the same entity, only one of 1027 such members may serve as a voting member: 1028 (j)âA representative of private for-profit child care 1029 providers, including private for-profit family child day care 1030 homes. 1031 Section 27.âSubsection (4) of section 1002.84, Florida 1032 Statutes, is amended to read: 1033 1002.84âEarly learning coalitions; school readiness powers 1034 and duties.âEach early learning coalition shall: 1035 (4)âEstablish a regional Warm-Line as directed by the 1036 department pursuant to s. 1002.82(2)(u). Regional Warm-Line 1037 staff shall provide onsite technical assistance, when requested, 1038 to assist child care facilities and family child day care homes 1039 with inquiries relating to the strategies, curriculum, and 1040 environmental adaptations the child care facilities and family 1041 child day care homes may need as they serve children with 1042 disabilities and other special needs. 1043 Section 28.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (1) of 1044 section 1002.88, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1045 1002.88âSchool readiness program provider standards; 1046 eligibility to deliver the school readiness program.â 1047 (1)âTo be eligible to deliver the school readiness program, 1048 a school readiness program provider must: 1049 (a)âBe a child care facility licensed under s. 402.305, a 1050 family child day care home licensed or registered under s. 1051 402.313, a large family child care home licensed under s. 1052 402.3131, a public school or nonpublic school exempt from 1053 licensure under s. 402.3025, a faith-based child care provider 1054 exempt from licensure under s. 402.316, a before-school or 1055 after-school program described in s. 402.305(1)(c), a child 1056 development program that is accredited by a national accrediting 1057 body and operates on a military installation that is certified 1058 by the United States Department of Defense, an informal child 1059 care provider to the extent authorized in the stateâs Child Care 1060 and Development Fund Plan as approved by the United States 1061 Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to 45 C.F.R. s. 1062 98.18, or a provider who has been issued a provisional license 1063 pursuant to s. 402.309. A provider may not deliver the program 1064 while holding a probation-status license under s. 402.310. 1065 (c)âProvide basic health and safety of its premises and 1066 facilities and compliance with requirements for age-appropriate 1067 immunizations of children enrolled in the school readiness 1068 program. 1069 1.âFor a provider that is licensed, compliance with s. 1070 402.305, s. 402.3131, or s. 402.313 and this subsection, as 1071 verified pursuant to s. 402.311, satisfies this requirement. 1072 2.âFor a provider that is a registered family child day 1073 care home or is not subject to licensure or registration by the 1074 Department of Children and Families, compliance with this 1075 subsection, as verified pursuant to s. 402.311, satisfies this 1076 requirement. Upon verification pursuant to s. 402.311, the 1077 provider shall annually post the health and safety checklist 1078 adopted by the department prominently on its premises in plain 1079 sight for visitors and parents and shall annually submit the 1080 checklist to its local early learning coalition. 1081 3.âFor a child development program that is accredited by a 1082 national accrediting body and operates on a military 1083 installation that is certified by the United States Department 1084 of Defense, the submission and verification of annual 1085 inspections pursuant to United States Department of Defense 1086 Instructions 6060.2 and 1402.05 satisfies this requirement. 1087 Section 29.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 1088 1002.895, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1089 1002.895âMarket rate schedule.âThe school readiness program 1090 market rate schedule shall be implemented as follows: 1091 (2)âThe market rate schedule must differentiate rates by 1092 provider type, including, but not limited to: 1093 (c)âFamily child day care homes licensed or registered 1094 under s. 402.313. 1095 Section 30.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) and subsection 1096 (4) of section 1002.92, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1097 1002.92âChild care and early childhood resource and 1098 referral.â 1099 (3)âChild care resource and referral agencies shall provide 1100 the following services: 1101 (a)âIdentification of existing public and private child 1102 care and early childhood education services, including child 1103 care services by public and private employers, and the 1104 development of an early learning provider performance profile of 1105 those services through the single statewide information system 1106 developed by the department under s. 1002.82(2)(q). These 1107 services may include family child day care, public and private 1108 child care programs, the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 1109 Program, Head Start, the school readiness program, special 1110 education programs for prekindergarten children with 1111 disabilities, services for children with developmental 1112 disabilities, full-time and part-time programs, before-school 1113 and after-school programs, and vacation care programs. The early 1114 learning provider performance profile shall include, but not be 1115 limited to: 1116 1.âType of program. 1117 2.âHours of service. 1118 3.âAges of children served. 1119 4.âNumber of children served. 1120 5.âProgram information. 1121 6.âFees and eligibility for services. 1122 7.âAvailability of transportation. 1123 8.âParticipation in the Child Care Food Program, if 1124 applicable. 1125 9.âA link to licensing inspection reports, if applicable. 1126 10.âThe components of the Voluntary Prekindergarten 1127 Education Program performance metric calculated under s. 1002.68 1128 which must consist of the program assessment composite score, 1129 learning gains score, achievement score, and its designations, 1130 if applicable. 1131 11.âThe school readiness program assessment composite score 1132 and program assessment care level composite score results 1133 delineated by infant classrooms, toddler classrooms, and 1134 preschool classrooms results under s. 1002.82, if applicable. 1135 12.âGold Seal Quality Care designation under s. 1002.945, 1136 if applicable. 1137 13.âIndication of whether the provider implements a 1138 curriculum approved by the department and the name of the 1139 curriculum, if applicable. 1140 14.âParticipation in school readiness child assessment 1141 under s. 1002.82. 1142 (4)âA child care facility licensed under s. 402.305 and 1143 licensed and registered family child day care homes must provide 1144 the statewide child care and resource and referral network with 1145 the following information annually: 1146 (a)âType of program. 1147 (b)âHours of service. 1148 (c)âAges of children served. 1149 (d)âFees and eligibility for services. 1150 Section 31.âSubsection (2) of section 1002.93, Florida 1151 Statutes, is amended to read: 1152 1002.93âSchool readiness program transportation services.â 1153 (2)âThe transportation servicers may only provide 1154 transportation to each child participating in the school 1155 readiness program to the extent that such transportation is 1156 necessary to provide child care opportunities that otherwise 1157 would not be available to a child whose home is more than a 1158 reasonable walking distance from the nearest child care facility 1159 or family child day care home. 1160 Section 32.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1), paragraphs (a) 1161 and (c) of subsection (3), and subsection (4) of section 1162 1002.945, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1163 1002.945âGold Seal Quality Care Program.â 1164 (1) 1165 (b)âA child care facility, large family child care home, or 1166 family child day care home that is accredited by an accrediting 1167 association approved by the Department of Education under 1168 subsection (3) and meets all other requirements shall, upon 1169 application to the department, receive a separate âGold Seal 1170 Quality Careâ designation. 1171 (3)(a)âIn order to be approved by the Department of 1172 Education for participation in the Gold Seal Quality Care 1173 Program, an accrediting association must apply to the department 1174 and demonstrate that it: 1175 1.âIs a recognized accrediting association. 1176 2.âHas accrediting standards that substantially meet or 1177 exceed the Gold Seal Quality Care standards adopted by the state 1178 board under subsection (2). 1179 3.âIs a registered corporation with the Department of 1180 State. 1181 4.âCan provide evidence that the process for accreditation 1182 has, at a minimum, all of the following components: 1183 a.âClearly defined prerequisites that a child care provider 1184 must meet before beginning the accreditation process. However, 1185 accreditation may not be granted to a child care facility, large 1186 family child care home, or family child day care home before the 1187 site is operational and is attended by children. 1188 b.âProcedures for completion of a self-study and 1189 comprehensive onsite verification process for each classroom 1190 that documents compliance with accrediting standards. 1191 c.âA training process for accreditation verifiers to ensure 1192 inter-rater reliability. 1193 d.âOngoing compliance procedures that include requiring 1194 each accredited child care facility, large family child care 1195 home, and family child day care home to file an annual report 1196 with the accrediting association and risk-based, onsite auditing 1197 protocols for accredited child care facilities, large family 1198 child care homes, and family child day care homes. 1199 e.âProcedures for the revocation of accreditation due to 1200 failure to maintain accrediting standards as evidenced by sub 1201 subparagraph d. or any other relevant information received by 1202 the accrediting association. 1203 f.âAccreditation renewal procedures that include an onsite 1204 verification occurring at least every 5 years. 1205 g.âA process for verifying continued accreditation 1206 compliance in the event of a transfer of ownership of 1207 facilities. 1208 h.âA process to communicate issues that arise during the 1209 accreditation period with governmental entities that have a 1210 vested interest in the Gold Seal Quality Care Program, including 1211 the Department of Education, the Department of Children and 1212 Families, the Department of Health, local licensing entities if 1213 applicable, and the early learning coalition. 1214 (c)âIf an accrediting association has granted accreditation 1215 to a child care facility, large family child care home, or 1216 family child day care under fraudulent terms or failed to 1217 conduct onsite verifications, the accrediting association shall 1218 be liable for the repayment of any rate differentials paid under 1219 subsection (6). 1220 (4)âIn order to obtain and maintain a designation as a Gold 1221 Seal Quality Care provider, a child care facility, large family 1222 child care home, or family child day care home must meet the 1223 following additional criteria: 1224 (a)âThe child care provider must not have had any class I 1225 violations, as defined by rule of the Department of Children and 1226 Families, within the 2 years preceding its application for 1227 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider. Commission of 1228 a class I violation shall be grounds for termination of the 1229 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider until the 1230 provider has no class I violations for a period of 2 years. 1231 (b)âThe child care provider must not have had three or more 1232 of the same class II violations, as defined by rule of the 1233 Department of Children and Families, within the 2 years 1234 preceding its application for designation as a Gold Seal Quality 1235 Care provider. Commission of three or more of the same class II 1236 violations within a 2-year period shall be grounds for 1237 termination of the designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care 1238 provider until the provider has no class II violations that are 1239 the same for a period of 1 year. 1240 (c)âThe child care provider must not have been cited for 1241 the same class III violation, as defined by rule of the 1242 Department of Children and Families, three or more times and 1243 failed to correct the violation within 1 year after the date of 1244 each citation, within the 2 years preceding its application for 1245 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider. Commission of 1246 the same class III violation three or more times and failure to 1247 correct within the required time during a 2-year period may be 1248 grounds for termination of the designation as a Gold Seal 1249 Quality Care provider until the provider has no class III 1250 violations for a period of 1 year. 1251 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), if the Department of 1252 Education determines through a formal process that a provider 1253 has been in business for at least 5 years and has no other class 1254 I violations recorded, the department may recommend to the state 1255 board that the provider maintain its Gold Seal Quality Care 1256 status. The state boardâs determination regarding such 1257 providerâs status is final. 1258 Section 33.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.